Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.270

Public and private schools—Administration of medication—Immunity from liability—Discontinuance, procedure.

(1) In the event a school employee administers oral medication, topical medication, eye drops, ear drops, or nasal spray to a student pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260 in substantial compliance with the prescription of the student's licensed health professional prescribing within the scope of the professional's prescriptive authority or the written instructions provided pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260(1)(d), and the other conditions set forth in RCW 28A.210.260 have been substantially complied with, then the employee, the employee's school district or school of employment, and the members of the governing board and chief administrator thereof shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in their individual or marital or governmental or corporate or other capacities as a result of the administration of the medication.

(2) The administration of oral medication, topical medication, eye drops, ear drops, or nasal spray to any student pursuant to RCW 28A.210.260 may be discontinued by a public school district or private school and the school district or school, its employees, its chief administrator, and members of its governing board shall not be liable in any criminal action or for civil damages in their governmental or corporate or individual or marital or other capacities as a result of the discontinuance of such administration: PROVIDED, That the chief administrator of the public school district or private school, or his or her designee, has first provided actual notice orally or in writing in advance of the date of discontinuance to a parent or legal guardian of the student or other person having legal control over the student.

[ 2019 c 314 s 42; 2013 c 180 s 2; 2012 c 16 s 2; 2000 c 63 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 208; 1982 c 195 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.31.155.]

NOTES:

Declaration—2019 c 314: See note following RCW 18.22.810.

Severability—1982 c 195: See note following RCW 28A.210.260.